Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 381 Title to Property and Restrictions on Use,
Ownership, and Alienation

381.010.
Commonwealth vested with ultimate property to lands.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky is deemed to have possessed the original, and has the ultimate property in and to all lands within her boundaries.

History.

2337.

381.020.
Titles allodial and subject to escheat — Right of eminent domain.

All land titles in this state are allodial, and, subject to escheat, the entire and absolute property in all land in this state is vested in the owners, according to the nature of their respective estates; except that the Commonwealth retains the right of eminent domain in and to all real estate.

History.

2338.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Escheat, property subject to, proceedings, KRS

393.020

,

393.150

,

393.160

.

Surveys of entries, when patent may issue, KRS

56.190

,

56.230

.

Unappropriated lands in county, Ohio River bed, KRS

56.210

,

56.220

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Richardson, Acquisition of Right of Way for Highway Purposes in Kentucky — Right of Eminent Domain and Just Compensation, 36 Ky. L.J. 159 (1948).

381.030.
Death of disseizor — Effect.

The death of a disseizor while seized of property shall not be such descent in law as to take away the right of entry of any person who has such right at the death of the disseizor, unless the disseizor has had fifteen (15) years’ peaceable possession after the disseizin was committed.

History.

2340.

381.040.
Estates may commence in future.

Any estate may be made to commence in the future by deed, in like manner as by will, and any estate which would be good as an executory devise or bequest shall be good if created by deed.

History.

2341.

381.050.
Estate created by conveyance to husband and wife — Will not to defeat right to the entirety by survivorship.

If real estate is conveyed or devised to husband and wife, unless a right by survivorship is expressly provided for, there shall be no mutual right to the entirety by survivorship between them, but they shall take as tenants in common, and the respective moieties shall be subject to the respective rights of the husband or wife as fixed in KRS Chapter 392, with all other incidents to such tenancy.

Where a conveyance or devise expressly creates a mutual right to the entirety by survivorship in real estate between a husband and wife, no provision of the will of the husband or wife shall be construed to defeat such right to the entirety by survivorship of the surviving spouse.

History.

2143: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 2, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

381.060.
Fee simple created, when — Possession vests in grantee.

Unless a different purpose appears by express words or necessary inference, every estate in land created by deed or will, without words of inheritance, shall be deemed a fee simple or such other estate as the grantor or testator had power to dispose of.

All deeds of bargain and sale, deeds to stand seized to use, deeds of release and deeds of trust, shall be held to vest the possession of the grantor in the grantee to the extent of the estate intended to be conveyed.

History.

491, 2342.

381.070.
Estates tail converted into estates in fee — Limitation on.

All estates heretofore or hereafter created, which, in former times, would have been deemed estates entailed, shall henceforth be held to be estates in fee simple; and every limitation on such an estate shall be held valid, if it would be valid when limited upon an estate in fee simple.

History.

2343.

381.080.
Construction of “without heirs,” “without children” or “issue” in deed or will.

Unless a different purpose is plainly expressed in the instrument, every limitation in a deed or will contingent upon a person dying “without heirs,” or “without children” or “issue,” or other words of like import, shall be construed a limitation to take effect when such person dies, unless the object on which the contingency is made to depend is then living, or, if a child of his body, such child is born within ten (10) months next thereafter.

History.

2344.

381.090.
Construction of “estate for life, remainder to heirs.”

If any estate is given by deed or will to any person for his life, and after his death to his heirs, or the heirs of his body, or his issue or descendants, such estate shall be construed to be an estate for life only in such person, and a remainder in fee simple in his heirs, or the heirs of his body, or his issue or descendants.

History.

2345.

381.100.
Contingent remainder.

A contingent remainder shall, in no case, fail for the want of a particular estate to support it.

History.

2346.

381.110.
Alienation or union of estate does not affect remainder.

The alienation of a particular estate on which a remainder depends, or the union of such estate with the inheritance by purchase or descent, shall not operate by merger or otherwise to defeat, impair or affect such remainder.

History.

2347.

381.120.
Joint tenants — Partition — Death of one.

Joint tenants may be compelled to make partition, and when a joint tenant dies, the joint tenant’s part of the joint estate, real or personal, shall descend to the joint tenant’s heirs, or pass by devise, or go to the joint tenant’s personal representative, subject to debts, curtesy, dower, or distribution.

History.

2348; 1998, ch. 267, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

381.130.
Exceptions to KRS 381.120.

KRS

381.120

shall not apply to any estate which joint tenants hold as executors or trustees, nor, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to an estate conveyed or devised to persons in their own right, when it manifestly appears, from the tenor of the instrument, that it was intended that the part of the one dying should belong to the others, neither shall it affect the mode of proceeding on any joint contract or judgment.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, one (1) or more joint tenants of real property may partition their interest in the real property during their lifetime by deed or other instrument.
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, one (1) or more joint tenants of real property may partition their interest in the real property during their lifetime by deed or other instrument.

The deed or other instrument shall express the intent of the joint tenant to partition the joint tenant’s interest in the real property and shall be recorded at the office of the county clerk in the county where the real property or any portion of the real property is located.

The partitioning shall be effective at the time the deed or other instrument is recorded.

Residential real property that is owned exclusively by husband and wife as joint tenants with a right of survivorship and actually occupied by them as a principal residence shall not be partitioned as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The deed or other instrument shall convert the partitioning joint tenant’s interest in the real property into a tenancy in common with the remaining joint tenants. If there are two (2) or more nonpartitioning joint tenants, the interests of the nonpartitioning joint tenants in relation to each other shall be governed pursuant to the terms of the instrument creating the interest.

History.

2349; 1998, ch. 267, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

381.135.
Court-appointed commissioners to determine division of land jointly held and allotment of dower or curtesy — Survey requirement.

As used in this subsection:

“Ownership interest in a closely held farm corporation or partnership” means any interest in a farm with one (1) or more of the shareholders or partners owning twenty percent (20%) or more of the corporation or partnership.

“Farm” means a tract of at least five (5) contiguous acres used for the production of agricultural or horticultural crops including, but not limited to, livestock, livestock products, poultry, poultry products, grain, hay, pastures, soybeans, tobacco, timber, orchard fruits, vegetables, flowers, or ornamental plants, including provision for dwellings for persons and their families who are engaged in the above agricultural use on the tract, but not including residential building development for sale or lease to the public.

A person desiring a division of land held jointly with others, a person desiring an allotment of dower or curtesy, or a person with an ownership interest of twenty percent (20%) or more in a closely held farm corporation or partnership may file in the Circuit Court of the county in which the land or the greater part thereof lies a petition containing a description of the land, a statement of the names of those having an interest in it, and the amount of such interest, with a prayer for the division or allotment; and, thereupon, all persons interested in the property who have not united in the petition shall be summoned to answer not more than twenty (20) days after service of the summons. The written evidences of the title to the land, or copies thereof, if there be any, must be filed with the petition.

The statutory guardian of an infant or guardian or conservator of a person adjudged mentally disabled may file or unite in the petition, in the names of, and in conjunction with such infant or mentally disabled person; and, if the petition be against an infant or mentally disabled person the guardian or conservator may appear and defend for them; if they fail to do so, the court shall appoint a discreet person for that purpose.

Upon such a petition by all interested in the property, or upon the expiration of twenty (20) days after the service of a summons on all who have an interest in the property and have not united in the petition, the court may order the division, or allotment of dower or curtesy, according to the rights of the parties.

The court shall appoint three (3) competent persons as commissioners to determine the division or allotment of land, having a due regard for the rights of all parties interested. Before proceeding to act, the commissioners shall take an oath to discharge their duty impartially.

The order of appointment shall fix a time and place for the meeting of the commissioners who shall meet accordingly; but, if prevented from meeting at the time and place so fixed, they may meet as soon thereafter as convenient, and may adjourn to such other time and place as they may agree upon, until their duty shall be performed.

The commissioners shall equitably determine the allotment to the parties of their respective interests in the land. A registered land surveyor shall perform the actual survey of the land in accordance with the determination made by the commissioners, and prepare the descriptions of the land, including all related maps, plats, and documents, and he shall affix thereto his personal seal and signature, unless such actual survey and the resultant description, maps, plats, and documents pertaining to this land are already in existence. The commissioners shall make report thereof to the court, which may either confirm, set aside, or remand the report to the commissioners for correction.

If the report be confirmed, a commissioner to be appointed for the purpose shall, by deed, convey to each party the land allotted to him.

If the report be confirmed by the Circuit Court, it, together with said surveyor’s descriptions, survey and all related documents, and the applicable deeds shall be certified by the clerk of that court to the county clerk, for record.

Two (2) of the commissioners may act, if one (1) refuses or fails to do so.

A party summoned may, by answer, controvert the allegations of the petition or contest the rights claimed therein; and, thereupon, the case shall be tried and decided as an ordinary action, but without the intervention of a jury.

The costs of the action shall be apportioned among the parties in the ratio of their interests, except that the costs arising from a contest of fact or law shall be adjudged against the unsuccessful party.

No verification of the pleadings shall be required.

The commissioners and the land surveyor shall be paid a reasonable compensation, to be taxed as costs.

This section shall not affect the jurisdiction of courts of equity to make partition or allot dower or curtesy.

History.

C.C. 499: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 68; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 302, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 508, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 96, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 227, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 316, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

381.136.
Life tenants and their descendants — Partition.

Where the land is held under a deed or will vesting a life estate in two (2) or more persons or in trust for their benefit, with remainder as to the share of each to his or her children or descendants, it shall be lawful for a court of equity, on the petition of one (1) of such life tenants and his or her children or descendants who would then be entitled to such remainder, all persons having interests in such lands being made parties, to partition such land so as to set apart to such life tenants and children or descendants so much of said land to which they shall be entitled in severalty; and to that alone shall attach the title or interest of after-born children or descendants in whom, by the terms of said deed or will, such a remainder would vest.

Where part of the land so held shall be situated in this state and part in another state, the court may, in making partition, take into consideration the value of all of said land, and set apart to those resident in this state land in this state equal to their full share of all said land, securing, by proper deeds and orders to the nonresidents, release of the interest of such residents in the lands in the other state or territory.

History.

C.C. 499a: amend. Acts 1886, ch. 1171, §§ 1, 2; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

381.140.
Posthumous child may take estate in remainder.

When any estate is limited by deed or will in remainder to the son or daughter, or the use of the son or daughter to be begotten of any person, such son or daughter, born after the death of his or her parent, shall take the estate in the same manner as if he or she had been born in the lifetime of the parent although no estate was created to support the remainder after the death of the parent.

History.

2350.

381.150.
Conveyance of greater estate than grantor owns — Effect.

A deed and warranty of land purporting to pass or assure a greater right or estate than the person can lawfully pass or assure, shall operate to convey on warrant so much of the right and estate as such person can lawfully convey. If such conveyance is made by a tenant for life it shall not work a forfeiture of his estate.

History.

2291, 2351.

381.160.
Purchaser evicted by heir of grantor may recover to extent of estate inherited.

If a deed such as that mentioned in KRS

381.150

, contains a general warranty of the estate it purports to convey, and there is a claimant of the land who has received any estate, real or personal, by gift, advancement, descent, devise or distribution from the vendor, such claimant shall be barred of recovery to the extent of the value of the estate so devised. If, after the claimant has recovered the land from such vendee, or if, after having been required to answer, he has denied the reception of any estate in either of the modes before named, the estate shall come to him in any such manner, the vendee, his heirs or personal representative, may recover from such claimant upon the warranty the value of such estate or so much thereof as will be sufficient to satisfy his demand.

History.

2352.

381.170.
Consideration paid by other than grantee — Effect.

When a deed is made to one (1) person, and the consideration is paid by another no use or trust results in favor of the latter unless the grantee takes a deed in his own name without the consent of the person paying the consideration, or unless the grantee in violation of a trust purchases the lands deeded with the effects of another person. Such deeds are fraudulent as against the existing debts and liabilities of the person paying the consideration.

History.

2353, 2354.

381.180.
Estates in trust subject to debts of beneficiary — Spendthrift trusts excepted — Other exceptions. [Repealed.]

381.190.
Sale of realty by trustee by virtue of pledge or deed of trust.

No sale of real estate by a trustee, by virtue of a pledge or deed of trust to secure the payment of debts, shall be valid or pass the title of the property specified in the deed or pledge, unless the sale is in pursuance to a judgment of court, or is made by an assignee under a voluntary deed of assignment, or unless the maker of the deed or pledge joins in a writing evidencing the sale.

History.

2356.

381.200.
Deeds construed to include buildings and appurtenances — Solar easements.

Every deed, unless an exception is made therein, shall be construed to include all buildings, privileges and appurtenances of every kind attached to the lands therein conveyed.

A solar easement may be obtained for the purpose of ensuring access to direct sunlight. Such easement shall be created in writing and shall be an interest in real property that may be acquired and transferred and shall be subject to the same recording and conveyancing requirements, except that a solar easement shall not be acquired by prescription.

History.

2357: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 341, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

381.210.
Reversion may be sold — Rights and duties of purchaser.

Rights of reversion may be sold and conveyed. The purchaser thereof shall be vested with all the privileges and advantages which attach to the estate in the hands of the reversioner, and shall be subject to all the duties and responsibilities in law or equity which any tenant might assert against the owner of the reversion, the right to which accrued before notice of the transfer.

History.

2359.

381.215.
Adoption of common law rule against perpetuities. [Repealed.]

381.216.
Wait-and-see doctrine — Reformation. [Repealed.]

381.217.
Exception in the case of pension trusts. [Repealed.]

381.218.
Abolition of fee simple determinable and possibility of reverter.

The estate known at common law as the fee simple determinable and the interest known as the possibility of reverter are abolished. Words which at common law would create a fee simple determinable shall be construed to create a fee simple subject to a right of entry for condition broken. In any case where a person would have a possibility of reverter at common law, he shall have a right of entry.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 167, § 4, effective June 16, 1960.

381.219.
Termination after thirty years of rights of entry created after July 1, 1960.

A fee simple subject to a right of entry for condition broken shall become a fee simple absolute if the specified contingency does not occur within thirty (30) years from the effective date of the instrument creating such fee simple subject to a right of entry. If such contingency occurs within said thirty (30) years the right of entry, which may be created in a person other than the person creating the interest or his heirs, shall become exercisable notwithstanding the rule against perpetuities. This section shall not apply to rights of entry created prior to July 1, 1960.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 167, § 5, effective June 16, 1960.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Kentucky Law Survey, Youngs, A Compendium of Cases on Future Interests in Kentucky, 6 N. Ky. L. Rev. 283 (1979).

381.220.
Restraints on alienation — Duration of — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

381.221.
Termination and preservation of forfeiture restrictions created before July 1, 1960.

Every possibility of reverter and right of entry created prior to July 1, 1960, shall cease to be valid or enforceable at the expiration of thirty (30) years after the effective date of the instrument creating it, unless before July 1, 1965, a declaration of intention to preserve it is filed for record with the county clerk of the county in which the real property is located.

The declaration shall be entitled “Declaration of Intention to Preserve Restrictions on the Use of Land,” and shall set forth:

The name of the record owner or owners of the fee in the land against whom the possibility of reverter or right of entry is intended to be preserved;

The names and addresses of the persons intending to preserve the possibility of reverter or right of entry;

A description of the land;

The terms of the restriction;

A reference to the instrument creating the possibility of reverter or right of entry and to the place where such instrument is recorded. The declaration shall be signed by each person named therein as intending to preserve the possibility of reverter or right of entry and shall be acknowledged or proved in the manner required to entitle a conveyance of real property to be recorded. The county clerk shall record the declaration in the record of deeds and shall index it in the general index of deeds in the same manner as if the record owner or owners of the land were the grantor or grantors and the persons intending to preserve the possibility of reverter or right of entry were the grantees in a deed of conveyance. For indexing and recording the clerk shall receive the same fees as are allowed for indexing and recording deeds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 167, § 6, effective June 16, 1960.

381.222.
Exceptions to KRS 381.219 and 381.221.

KRS

381.219

and

381.221

shall not apply to any possibility of reverter or right of entry contained in a deed, gift or grant from the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof; nor shall they apply where both the fee simple determinable and the succeeding interest, or both the fee simple subject to a right of entry and the right of entry, are for public, charitable or religious purposes; nor shall they affect any lease present or future or any easement, right of way, mortgage or trust, or any communication, transmission, or transportation lines, or any public highway, right to take minerals, or charge for support during the life of a person or persons, or any restrictive covenant without right of entry or reverter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 167, § 7, effective June 16, 1960.

381.223.
Application of KRS 381.218, 381.219, 381.221, 381.222, and 381.223.

To the extent they are not superseded by KRS

381.224

,

381.225

, and

381.226

, and except as provided in KRS

381.218

,

381.219

,

381.221

,

381.222

, and

381.223

shall apply only to inter vivos instruments and wills taking effect after July 1, 1960, and to appointments made after July 1, 1960, including appointments by inter vivos instrument or will under powers created before July 1, 1960.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 167, § 9, effective June 16, 1960; 2010, ch. 21, § 12, effective July 15, 2010.

381.224.
Rule against perpetuities abrogated.

An interest created in real or personal property shall not be void by reason of any rule against perpetuities, whether the common law rule or otherwise. The common law rule against perpetuities shall not be in force in this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

381.225.
Permissible period of power of alienation under trust — Future interest.

A future interest or trust is void if it suspends the power of alienation for longer than the permissible period. The power of alienation is the power to convey to another an absolute fee in possession of land, or full ownership of personalty. The permissible period is within twenty-one (21) years after the death of an individual or individuals then alive.

If the settlor of an inter vivos trust has an unlimited power to revoke, the permissible period is computed from the termination of that power.

If a future property interest or trust is created by exercise of a power of appointment, the permissible period is computed from the time the power is exercised if the power is a general power exercisable in favor of the donee, the donee’s estate, the donee’s creditors, or the creditors of the donee’s estate, whether or not it is exercisable in favor of others, and even if the general power is exercisable only by will; in the case of other powers, the permissible period is computed from the time the power is created, unless the instrument exercising the power provides that the period is computed from the date the power is irrevocably exercised, but facts at the time the power is exercised are considered in determining whether the power of alienation is suspended beyond the death of an individual or individuals alive at the time of creation of the power plus twenty-one (21) years.

The power of alienation is suspended when there are no persons who, alone or in combination with others, can convey an absolute fee in possession of land, or full ownership of personalty.

There is no suspension of the power of alienation by a trust or by equitable interests under a trust if the trustee has power to sell, either expressed or implied, or if there is a power to terminate the trust by distributing the property subject to the trust to the beneficiaries in fee simple in one (1) or more persons then living.

This section does not apply to limit any of the following:

Transfers, outright or in trust, for charitable purposes;

Transfers to one (1) or more charitable organizations as described in 26

U.S.C. secs. 170(c)

, 2055(a), and 2522(a), or any similar statute;

A future interest or a power of appointment arising out of a nondonative transfer, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of:

A premarital or post-marital agreement;

A separation or divorce settlement;

An arrangement similar to subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph arising out of a prospective, existing, or previous marital relationship between the parties;

A contract to make or revoke a will or trust;

A contract to exercise or not to exercise a power of appointment;

A transfer in satisfaction of a duty of support; or

A reciprocal transfer;

A transfer to a trust or other property arrangement forming part of a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, health, disability, death benefit, income deferral, or other current or deferred benefit plan for one (1) or more employees, independent contractors, or their beneficiaries or spouses, to which contributions are made for the purposes of distributing to or for the benefit of the participants or their beneficiaries or spouses the property, income, or principal in the trust or other property arrangement; or

A property interest, power of appointment, or arrangement that was not subject to the common law rule against perpetuities or is excluded by another statute of this Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 21, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 41, § 38, effective July 15, 2020.

381.226.
Applicability of KRS 381.224 and 381.225 to property interests and powers of appointment — Construction of provisions requiring vesting within period provided by common law rule against perpetuities.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, KRS

381.224

and

381.225

shall apply to:

A future property interest or a power of appointment that is created on or after July 15, 2010, including a property interest or power of appointment created pursuant to the exercise of a power of appointment under an instrument executed prior to July 15, 2010; or

A future property interest or a power of appointment:

That is created pursuant to the laws of any state that does not have a rule against perpetuities in force;

That is not covered by any previously existing rule against perpetuities; and

To which, after July 15, 2010, the laws of this state are made applicable by transfer of the situs of a trust to Kentucky, by a change in the law governing a trust instrument to Kentucky law, or otherwise.

With respect to a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment created either before or after July 15, 2010, which is determined in a judicial proceeding commenced on or after July 15, 2010, to violate Kentucky’s rule against perpetuities as that rule existed at the time the interest or power was created, a court upon the petition of an interested person may reform the disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor’s manifested plan of disposition and is within the limits of the rule against perpetuities applicable when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment was created.

For purposes of this section only, a future property interest or a power of appointment is created when the power is irrevocably exercised or when a revocable exercise becomes irrevocable.

An instrument which contains a provision requiring the vesting of all interests created by the instrument within the period provided by the common law rule against perpetuities shall be construed as requiring the interests to vest within the period specified by this section and KRS

381.224

and

381.225

, unless the provision is determined by a court to have been included in the instrument for reasons other than protecting the interest against a violation of the common law rule against perpetuities. For purposes of this subsection, the term “common law rule against perpetuities” shall include KRS

381.215

,

381.216

, and

381.217

prior to their repeal on July 15, 2010. This subsection does not apply to any interest in property created by the exercise of the special power of appointment granted by an instrument that was irrevocable on September 25, 1985.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 21, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 41, § 39, effective July 15, 2020.

381.230.
Possession unnecessary in action for trespass.

The owner of land may maintain the appropriate action to recover damages for any trespass or injury committed thereon, or to prevent or restrain any trespass or other injury thereto or thereon, notwithstanding the owner may not have the actual possession of the land at the time of the commission of the trespass.

History.

2361.

381.231.
Definitions.

A “trespasser” means any person who enters or goes upon the real estate of another without any right, lawful authority or invitation, either expressed or implied, but does not include persons who come within the scope of the “attractive nuisance” doctrine.

An owner of real estate means any person who possesses any interest in real estate or any lawful occupant of real estate, including a burial ground.

“Burial ground” means any public or privately owned parcel of land upon which a person or persons are interred or buried.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 379, § 1; 2002, ch. 276, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

381.232.
Liability for certain injuries.

The owner of real estate shall not be liable to any trespasser for injuries sustained by the trespasser on the real estate of the owner, except for injuries which are intentionally inflicted by the owner or someone acting for the owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 379, § 2.

381.240.
Title to land in adverse possession not to be certified.

No county clerk or other county or state officer shall officially certify to any abstract or statement of title to lands in this state, where such lands are in the actual possession of another than the person or corporation shown to be the owner of the abstract or certificate, when such person in possession is claiming such lands under title adverse to that shown in such abstract or certificate.

History.

2379a-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Occupancy for seven years with title bars right of entry, exception, KRS

413.060

.

Sale of land adversely held, KRS

372.070

.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint to Establish Title by Adverse Possession, Form 303.01.

381.250.
Certification prohibited when more than one patent.

If two (2) or more patents have been issued for the same land, whether by this state or by the State of Virginia, no county clerk or other county or state officer shall officially certify that the records show, or that the fact is that the title is in any of the patentees, or in any person claiming under any of the patents.

History.

2379a-2.

381.260.
Grants-in-aid of charity valid.

Every grant, conveyance, legacy, bequest, devise, gift, appointment, assignment and transfer of property, whenever made and in whatever form, shall be valid (a) if made to any corporation, association, trust, foundation, or similar organization or entity, created or formed for and devoted solely to charitable, religious, scientific, literary, educational, humane, benevolent or like purposes or, (b) except as otherwise provided by statute, if it is made for any charitable or humane purpose and if it points out with reasonable certainty the purposes of the charity and the beneficiaries thereof.

A grant, conveyance, legacy, bequest, devise, gift, appointment, assignment and transfer of property, whenever made and in whatever form, is deemed to point out with reasonable certainty the purposes of the charity and beneficiaries thereof if and so long as the same is to or for the use of any corporation, trust, community chest, fund, foundation, or other entity organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes, including the encouragement of art and the prevention of cruelty to children or animals, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private stockholder or individual (except as reasonable compensation for services rendered), and no substantial part of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda, or otherwise attempting, to influence legislation, and which does not participate in, or intervene in (including the publishing or distributing of statements), any political campaign on behalf of any candidate for public office, even though such corporation, trust, fund, foundation or other entity is authorized to apply the trust income or property to any class or classes of charitable purposes mentioned above and the trustee or other managing individual or body is able and willing to make the selection.

History.

317: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 211, § 1(1); 1980, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

381.270.
Gift to charity not defeated for want of trustee.

No charity shall be defeated for want of a trustee or other person in whom the title may vest; but courts of equity may uphold the charity by appointing trustees, if there be none, or by taking control of the fund or property, and directing its management and settling who is the beneficiary thereof.

History.

318.

381.280.
Forfeiture of right to property for killing or victimizing decedent
— Exemptions — Escheat to elder and vulnerable victims trust fund.

If the husband, wife, heir-at-law, beneficiary under a will, joint tenant with the right of survivorship or the beneficiary under any insurance policy takes the life of the decedent or victimizes the decedent by the commission of any felony under KRS Chapter 209 and in either circumstance is convicted therefor, the person so convicted forfeits all interest in and to the property of the decedent, including any interest he or she would receive as surviving joint tenant, and the property interest or insurable interest so forfeited descends to the decedent’s other heirs-at-law, beneficiaries, or joint tenants, unless otherwise disposed of by the decedent. A judge sentencing a person for a offense that triggers a forfeiture under this section shall inform the defendant of the provisions of this section at sentencing.

A forfeiture under subsection (1) of this section:

Shall not apply in cases involving the commission of any felony under KRS Chapter 209 where the will, deed, or insurance policy was executed prior to January 1, 2012;

Shall not apply in cases where the decedent, with knowledge of the person’s disqualification, reaffirmed the right of the husband, wife, heir-at-law, beneficiary under a will, joint tenant with the right of survivorship, or insurance policy beneficiary to receive the property by executing a new or modified will or codicil, insurance policy or policy modification, or deed; and

Shall not apply in cases of a felony under KRS Chapter 209 committed prior to January 1, 2012.

If, after the provisions of this section are applied, there are no other heirs-at-law, beneficiaries, or joint tenants of the decedent as to all or part of the interest forfeited, the forfeited interest shall escheat to the state under KRS Chapter 393. The Department of the Treasury shall, after liquidation of the interest, pay the proceeds into the elder and vulnerable adult victims trust fund established in KRS

41.305

.

History.

1406a: amend. Acts 2011, ch. 43, § 2, effective January 1, 2012; 2011, ch. 43, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

381.290.
Rights of alien intending to be naturalized.

After declaring his intention to become a citizen of the United States, according to the forms required by law, any alien, not an enemy, may recover, inherit, hold, and pass by descent, devise or otherwise, any interest in real or personal property, in the same manner as if he were a citizen of this state.

History.

334.

381.300.
Realty of nonresident alien liable to escheat after eight years unless he becomes citizen.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the real estate of a nonresident alien may be escheated to the state at any time after the expiration of eight (8) years after the time he acquires title thereto.

Any alien who has purchased, or contracted to purchase, any real estate, or who holds or has title thereto, and who becomes a citizen of the United States before the property is escheated, and any purchaser, lessee, heir, or devisee, from him, if a citizen of the United States, who becomes the owner thereof by purchase or inheritance before the property is escheated, shall take and hold the property free and released from any right or claim of the state by reason of such person’s having been an alien.

History.

335: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 275, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

381.310.
Spouses and children of citizens — Property rights.

Any person whose spouse is a citizen of the United States, and any person whose father or mother, at the time of his birth, was a citizen thereof, although born out of the United States, may take and hold real or personal estate by devise, purchase, descent, or distribution.

History.

336: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 70.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Status of Wife, § 11.2.